Indiana, session 2026, HB1385.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-21-10-5.7, AS ADDED BY P.L.216-2025,
SECTION 22, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.7. As used in this chapter, "state directed
payment program" means a payment arrangement under section 8.5 of
this chapter and authorized under 42 CFR 438.6(c) that allows
requires the office to direct specific payments to a hospital by the
managed care organizations that contract with the office to provide
health coverage to Medicaid recipients.
SECTION 2. IC 16-21-10-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.216-2025,
SECTION 25, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) This section does not apply to the use of the
incremental fee described in section 13.3 of this chapter. Subject to
subsection (b), the office may shall develop the following programs
designed to increase Medicaid reimbursement for inpatient and
outpatient hospital services provided by a hospital to Medicaid
recipients:
(1) A program concerning reimbursement for the Medicaid
2026 IN 1385—LS 6824/DI 147


fee-for-service program that, in the aggregate, will result in
payments equivalent to the level of payment that would be paid
under federal Medicare payment principles.
(2) A program concerning reimbursement for the Medicaid risk
based managed care program that, in the aggregate, will result in
payments equivalent to the level of payment that would be paid
under federal Medicare payment principles, and up to any
reimbursement approved under a state directed payment program
set forth in section 8.5 of this chapter.
(b) The office shall not submit to the United States Department of
Health and Human Services any Medicaid state plan amendments,
waiver requests, or revisions to any Medicaid state plan amendments
or waiver requests, to implement or continue the implementation of this
chapter until the office has submitted a written report to the budget
committee concerning the amendments, waivers, or revisions described
in this subsection, including the following:
(1) The methodology to be used by the office in calculating the
increased Medicaid reimbursement under the programs described
in subsection (a).
(2) The methodology to be used by the office in calculating,
imposing, or collecting the fee, or any other matter relating to the
fee.
(3) The determination of Medicaid disproportionate share
allotments under section 11 of this chapter (subject to section
11(d) and 11(e) of this chapter) that are to be funded by the fee,
including the formula for distributing the Medicaid
disproportionate share allotments.
(4) The distribution to private psychiatric institutions under
section 13 of this chapter.
(c) This subsection applies to the programs described in subsection
(a). The state share dollars for the programs must consist of the
following:
(1) Fees paid under this chapter.
(2) The hospital care for the indigent funds allocated under
section 10 of this chapter.
(3) Other sources of state share dollars available to the office.
excluding intergovernmental transfers of funds made by or on
behalf of a hospital.
The money described in subdivisions (1) and (2) may be used only to
fund the part of the payments that exceed the Medicaid reimbursement
rates in effect on June 30, 2011.
(d) This subsection applies to the programs described in subsection
2026 IN 1385—LS 6824/DI 147


(a). If the state is unable to maintain the funding under subsection
(c)(3) for the payments at Medicaid reimbursement levels in effect on
June 30, 2011, because of budgetary constraints, the office shall reduce
inpatient and outpatient hospital Medicaid reimbursement rates under
subsection (a)(1) or (a)(2) or request approval from the United States
Department of Health and Human Services to increase the fee to
prevent a decrease in Medicaid reimbursement for hospital services. If
the United States Department of Health and Human Services does not
approve an increase in the fee, the office shall cease to collect the fee
and the programs described in subsection (a) are terminated.
SECTION 3. IC 16-21-10-8.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.216-2025,
SECTION 26, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. (a) Subject to subsection (b), beginning July
1, 2025, or thereafter, the office may implement a state directed
payment program in which payments are made for inpatient and
outpatient hospital services as follows:
(1) Subject to available state share funding and federal medical
assistance available to the plan for coverage of plan participants
described in Section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) of the federal Social
Security Act in effect on January 1, 2025, the reimbursement rates
for inpatient and outpatient hospital services under the state
directed payment program: may be established at a rate greater
than
(A) must be at a rate that is at least the Medicare equivalent
reimbursement rates, taking into account the amount of fees
paid by the hospitals to receive Medicare reimbursement
rates; and
(B) but may not exceed the maximum reimbursement rates
established by federal law.
(2) The office may implement the state directed payment program
through the establishment of classes of hospitals with different
rates of reimbursement among the classes, as set forth in
subsection (c), and in a manner that is consistent with federal law.
(3) Before January 1, 2026, the office shall apply to the United
States Department of Health and Human Services for the review
and approval of a state directed payment program. The office may
receive input from hospitals and other interested parties in the
development of the documentation submitted with the application
under this subdivision.
(4) The office may not implement the state directed payment
program without the approval of the United States Department of
Health and Human Services. To the extent allowed by the United
2026 IN 1385—LS 6824/DI 147


States Department of Health and Human Services, the office shall
implement the state directed payment program on or after July 1,
2025.
(5) The office may not implement a fee under the state directed
payment program without the approval of the fee by the United
States Department of Health and Human Services, including any
waiver related to the fee, to fund the state share of the payments
under the state directed payment program. To the extent allowed
by the United States Department of Health and Human Services,
the office shall use the fee to fund the state directed payment
program on or after July 1, 2025.
(6) The office shall make payments under the state directed
payment program to managed care organizations that contract
with the office to provide medical assistance to Medicaid
recipients as follows:
(A) Except as provided in clause (B), capitation payments at
levels necessary to pay inpatient and outpatient hospital
services at reimbursement rates equal to the reimbursement
rates established under subdivision (1). The fee must be used
to pay the state share of the part of the capitation payments
that fund the portion of the reimbursement rates that exceed
the reimbursement rates in effect on June 30, 2011. However,
the fees collected under this section and sections 8 and 13.3 of
this chapter may not fund the state share of the capitation
payments of the managed care assessment fee under
IC 27-1-50.3.
(B) For plan enrollees described in section 13.3(b)(1)(A) of
this chapter, capitation payments at a level sufficient to pay
inpatient and outpatient hospital services at reimbursement
rates equal to the reimbursement rates established by
subdivision (1). The incremental fee shall fund the entire state
share of these capitation payments. However, the fees
collected under this section and sections 8 and 13.3 of this
chapter may not fund the state share of the capitation payments
of the managed care assessment fee under IC 27-1-50.3.
(b) The office may only implement a state directed payment
program under this section if the budget committee has conducted a
review of the state directed payment program.
(c) The classes of hospitals may be constructed as follows:
(1) Class 1 hospitals consist of critical access hospitals and rural
hospitals.
(2) Class 2 hospitals consist of a hospital licensed under
2026 IN 1385—LS 6824/DI 147


IC 16-21-2 that is not described in subdivision (1) and that is:
(A) established and governed under IC 16-22-2, IC 16-22-8, or
IC 16-23; or
(B) an Indiana nonprofit hospital system that has a net patient
revenue derived in Indiana of less than two billion dollars
($2,000,000,000), as determined by the hospital's most
recently submitted audited financial statement.
(3) Class 3 hospitals consist of psychiatric hospitals, rehabilitative
hospitals, and acute long term care hospitals and that are not
described in subdivision (1) or (2).
(4) Class 4 hospitals consist of any hospital not described in
subdivision (1) through (3) and that are subject to this chapter.
SECTION 4. IC 16-21-10-13.3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.216-2025,
SECTION 30, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13.3. (a) This section is effective beginning
February 1, 2015. As used in this section, "plan" refers to the healthy
Indiana plan established in IC 12-15-44.5.
(b) Subject to subsections (c) through (e), the incremental fee under
this section may be used to fund the state share of the expenses
specified in this subsection if, after January 31, 2015, but before the
collection of the fee under this section, the following occur:
(1) The office establishes a fee formula to be used to fund the
state share of the Medicaid program or the following expenses
described in this subdivision:
(A) The state share of the capitated payments made to a
managed care organization that contracts with the office to
provide health coverage under the plan to plan enrollees other
than plan enrollees who are eligible for the plan under Section
1931 of the federal Social Security Act, including portions of
the capitation attributed to a state directed payment program
under section 8.5 of this chapter.
(B) The state share of capitated payments described in clause
(A) for plan enrollees who are eligible for the plan under
Section 1931 of the federal Social Security Act that are limited
to the difference between:
(i) the capitation rates effective September 1, 2014,
developed using Medicaid reimbursement rates; and
(ii) the capitation rates applicable for the plan developed
using the plan's Medicare reimbursement rates described in
IC 12-15-44.5-5(a)(2), or higher reimbursement amounts for
any state fiscal year for which the state directed payment
program established under section 8.5 of this chapter is in
2026 IN 1385—LS 6824/DI 147


effect.
(C) The state share of the state's contributions to plan enrollee
accounts.
(D) The state share of amounts used to pay premiums for a
premium assistance plan implemented under
IC 12-15-44.2-20.
(E) The state share of the costs of increasing reimbursement
rates for physician services provided to individuals enrolled in
Medicaid programs other than the plan, but not to exceed the
difference between the Medicaid fee schedule for a physician
service that was in effect before the implementation of the plan
and the amount equal to seventy-five percent (75%) of the
previous year federal Medicare reimbursement rate for a
physician service. The incremental fee may not be used for the
amount that exceeds seventy-five percent (75%) of the federal
Medicare reimbursement rate for a physician service.
(F) The state share of the state's administrative costs that, for
purposes of this clause, may not exceed one hundred seventy
dollars ($170) per person per plan enrollee per year, and
adjusted annually by the Consumer Price Index.
(2) The office approves a process to be used for reconciling:
(A) the state share of the costs of the plan;
(B) the amounts used to fund the state share of the costs of the
plan; and
(C) the amount of fees assessed for funding the state share of
the costs of the plan.
For purposes of this subdivision, "costs of the plan" includes the
costs of the expenses listed in subdivision (1)(A) through (1)(F).
The fees collected for the purposes of subdivision (1)(A) through (1)(F)
shall be deposited into the incremental hospital fee fund established by
section 13.5 of this chapter.
(c) For each state fiscal year for which the fee authorized by this
section is used to fund the state share of the expenses described in
subsection (b)(1), the amount of fees shall be reduced by:
(1) the amount of funds annually designated by the general
assembly to be deposited in the healthy Indiana plan trust fund
established by IC 12-15-44.2-17; less
(2) the annual cigarette tax funds annually appropriated by the
general assembly for childhood immunization programs under
IC 12-15-44.2-17(a)(3).
(d) The incremental fee described in this section may not:
(1) be assessed before July 1, 2016; and
2026 IN 1385—LS 6824/DI 147


(2) be assessed or collected on or after the termination of the plan.
(e) This section is not intended to and may not be construed to
change or affect any component of the programs established under
section 8 of this chapter.
(f) The office of the secretary shall do the following:
(1) Perform a reconciliation at the end of each state fiscal year
to ensure that portions of the capitation rates attributable to
the payment of the incremental fee under this section were
appropriately and accurately calculated.
(2) Not later than November 1 of each year, submit a report
to the budget committee with the results of the reconciliation
described in subdivision (1) for the preceding state fiscal year.
SECTION 5. IC 16-21-10-13.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.216-2025,
SECTION 31, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13.5. (a) The incremental hospital fee fund is
established for the purpose of holding fees collected under section 13.3
of this chapter.
(b) The office shall administer the fund.
(c) Money in the fund consists of the following:
(1) Fees collected under section 13.3 of this chapter.
(2) Donations, gifts, and money received from any other source.
(3) Interest accrued under this section.
(d) Money in the fund may be used only for the following:
(1) To fund the state share of the expenses listed in section
13.3(b)(1)(A) through 13.3(b)(1)(F) of this chapter.
(2) To refund hospitals in the same manner as described in
subsection (g) as soon as reasonably possible after the beginning
of the termination of the healthy Indiana plan.
(3) To fund the Medicaid program.
(e) Money remaining in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year
does not revert to the state general fund.
(f) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public funds may be invested. Interest that accrues
from these investments shall be deposited in the fund.
(g) Upon the beginning of the termination of the healthy Indiana
plan, money collected under section 13.3 of this chapter and any
accrued interest remaining in the fund shall be distributed to the
hospitals on a pro rata basis based upon the fees authorized by this
chapter that were paid by each hospital for the state fiscal year that
ended immediately before the beginning of the termination of the
healthy Indiana plan.
2026 IN 1385—LS 6824/DI 147


SECTION 6. IC 16-21-10-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.216-2025,
SECTION 32, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) This section does not apply to the use of
the incremental fee described in section 13.3 of this chapter.
(b) The fees collected under section 8 and the fees collected and
utilized under section 8.5 of this chapter may must be used only as
described in this chapter or to pay the state's share of the cost for
Medicaid services provided under the federal Medicaid program (42
U.S.C. 1396 et seq.) as follows:
(1) Twenty-eight and five-tenths percent (28.5%) may to be used
by the office for Medicaid expenses.
(2) Seventy-one and five-tenths percent (71.5%) to hospitals to
leverage federal funds to increase Medicaid reimbursement
for hospitals.
(c) Subject to budget committee review, for any state fiscal year for
which the managed care assessment fee under IC 27-1-50.3 is assessed
in an amount that is at least equal to the net amount set forth in
subsection (b)(1), the fee may be used to fund a state directed payment,
as described in section 8.5 of this chapter.
SECTION 7. IC 16-21-18-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.216-2025,
SECTION 35, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "prices" means the
amounts that are paid to and collected by a hospital for patient care
services, including the final amounts reimbursed by a health
insurance plan and paid by a patient.
SECTION 8. IC 16-21-18-4, AS ADDED BY P.L.216-2025,
SECTION 35, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The office of management and budget shall
develop a methodology to conduct the study of commercial:
(1) inpatient hospital prices; and
(2) outpatient hospital prices;
including using Indiana hospital pricing data from calendar years 2023
and year 2024 to determine Indiana's statewide average inpatient and
outpatient hospital prices.
(b) The methodology developed under subsection (a):
(1) must utilize at least eighty-five percent (85%) of paid
claims data from hospitals for the 2024 calendar year; and
(2) may not utilize the price transparency files required under
45 CFR 180 or 45 CFR 147.212.
(b) (c) The office of management and budget shall present the
methodology to the budget committee for review.
SECTION 9. IC 16-21-18-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.216-2025,
2026 IN 1385—LS 6824/DI 147


SECTION 35, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5. (a) Before June September 30, 2026, the
office of management and budget shall conduct the study described in
section 4 of this chapter, using the methodology that was reviewed by
the budget committee.
(b) The office of management and budget shall submit a report to
the governor and to the general assembly in an electronic format under
IC 5-14-6 of the office of management and budget's findings under the
study.
SECTION 10. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1385—LS 6824/DI 147